Utah statutes.
38-1a-401.   Notice of retention.

(1) (a)  A person who desires to claim a preconstruction lien on real property shall file a notice of retention with the registry no later than 20 days after the person commences providing preconstruction service for the anticipated improvement on the real property.

(b)  A person who fails to file a timely notice of retention as required in this section may not claim a valid preconstruction lien.

(c)  A timely filed notice of retention is effective as to each preconstruction service that the person filing the notice provides for the anticipated improvement under a single original contract, including preconstruction service that the person provides to more than one supervising subcontractor under that original contract.

(d)  A notice of retention filed for preconstruction service provided or to be provided under an original contract for an anticipated improvement on real property is not valid for preconstruction service provided or to be provided under a separate original contract for an anticipated improvement on the same real property.

(e)  A notice of retention that is timely filed with the database with respect to an anticipated improvement is considered to have been filed at the same time as the earliest timely filed notice of retention for that anticipated improvement.

(f)  A notice of retention shall include:

(i)  the name, address, telephone number, and email address of the person providing the preconstruction service;

(ii)  the name, address, telephone number, and email address of the person who employed the person providing the preconstruction service;

(iii)  a general description of the preconstruction service the person provided or will provide;

(iv)  the name of the record or reputed owner;

(v)  the name of the county in which the property on which the anticipated improvement will occur is located;

(vi) (A)  the tax parcel identification number of each parcel included in that property; or

(B)  the entry number of a previously filed notice of retention that includes the tax parcel identification number of each parcel included in that property; and

(vii)  a statement that the person filing the notice intends to claim a preconstruction lien if the person is not paid for the preconstruction service the person provides.

(g) (i)  A claimant who is an original contractor or a supervisory subcontractor may include in a notice of retention the name, address, and telephone number of each subcontractor who is under contract with the claimant to provide preconstruction service that the claimant is under contract to provide.

(ii)  The inclusion of a subcontractor in a notice of retention filed by another claimant is not a substitute for the subcontractor's own submission of a notice of retention.

(2)  The burden is on the person filing the notice of retention to prove that the person has substantially complied with the requirements of this section.

(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), a person required by this section to file a notice of retention is required to give only one notice for each anticipated improvement.

(b) A person who provides preconstruction service under more than one original contract for the same anticipated improvement and desires to claim a preconstruction lien for preconstruction service provided under each original contract shall file a separate notice of retention for preconstruction service provided under each original contract.

(4)  A person filing a notice of retention by alternate means is responsible for verifying and changing any incorrect information in the notice of retention before the expiration of the period during which the notice is required to be filed.

